Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60M.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Contracting with unlicensed person prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) A producer or surety must not hire or contract with a bail enforcement agent to arrest a person for whom the producer or surety is acting as a bonding agent unless the agent has a valid bail enforcement agent license. new text end new text begin (b) A violation of this subdivision is a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Bail enforcement agent. new text end new text begin "Bail enforcement agent" means a person employed by or contracted with a producer to arrest a person for whom the producer is acting as a bonding agent. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Board review. "Board review" means the process by which the board reviews and evaluates private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end license applications. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Applicant. "Applicant" means any individual, partnership or corporation who has made application for a private detective or protective agent licensenew text begin and any individual who has made application for a bail enforcement agent licensenew text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. License. "License" means a private detective license deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end a protective agent licensenew text begin , or a bail enforcement agent licensenew text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. License holder. "License holder" means any individual, partnership as defined in section 323A.0101, clause (8), or corporation licensed to perform the duties of a private detective or a protective agentnew text begin and any individual licensed to perform the duties of a bail enforcement agentnew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10d. new text end new text begin Producer. new text end new text begin "Producer" has the meaning given in section 60M.01, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Surety. new text end new text begin "Surety" has the meaning given in section 60M.01, subdivision 14. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3311, is amended to read: 326.3311 POWERS AND DUTIES. The board has the following powers and duties: (1) to receive and review all applications for private detective deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , and bail enforcement agentnew text end licenses; (2) to approve applications for private detective deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , and bail enforcement agentnew text end licenses and issue, or reissue licenses as provided in sections 326.32 to 326.339; (3) to deny applications for private detective deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , and bail enforcement agentnew text end licenses if the applicants do not meet the requirements of sections 326.32 to 326.339; upon denial of a license application, the board shall notify the applicant of the denial and the facts and circumstances that constitute the denial; the board shall advise the applicant of the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14; (4) to enforce all laws and rules governing private detectives deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentsnew text begin , and bail enforcement agentsnew text end ; (5) to suspend or revoke the license of a license holder or impose a civil penalty on a license holder for violations of any provision of sections 326.32 to 326.339 or the rules of the board; (6) to investigate and refer for prosecution all criminal violations by individuals and entities; and (7) to investigate and refer for prosecution any individuals and entities operating as private detectives or protective agents without a license. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3331, is amended to read: 326.3331 RULEMAKING. The board shall adopt rules under chapter 14 to govern the selection, training, conduct, discipline, and licensing of private detectives deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentsnew text begin , and bail enforcement agentsnew text end , and any other matters necessary to carry out duties imposed by sections 326.32 to 326.339. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.336, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Identification card. An identification card must be issued by the license holder to each employeenew text begin in connection with the business of a private detective or protective agentnew text end . The card must be in the possession of the employee to whom it is issued at all times. The identification card must contain the license holder's name, logo (if any), address or Minnesota office address, and the employee's photograph and physical description. The card must be signed by the employee and by the license holder, qualified representative, or Minnesota office manager. The card must be presented upon request. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.336, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Failure to return property. Any person who shall be issued an identification card, badge, holster, weapon, shield, or any other equipment bearing the name, trademark or trade name, or any combination thereof, of any licensed agencynew text begin in connection with the business of a private detective or protective agentnew text end , or indicating that such person is a private detective, protective agent, or employee of same, who does not return such badge, weapon, holster, identification card, uniform emblem, or other equipment to the owner thereof within ten days of the termination of employment, or of receiving a written request to return same, made by certified mail to the person's last known address, whichever shall last occur, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.336, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Confidentiality; false statements. No employee of any license holder new text begin engaged in the business of a private detective or protective agent new text end shall divulge to anyone other than the employer, or as the employer shall direct, except as may be required by law, any information acquired during such employment in respect of any matter or investigation undertaken or done by such employer. Any employee who shall make any false statement in an employment statement or who willfully makes a false report to the employer in respect to any matter in the course of the employer's business, or who shall otherwise violate the provisions of this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required contents. new text begin (a) new text end The rules adopted by the board must require: (1) 12 hours of preassignment or on-the-job certified training within the first 21 days of employmentnew text begin in connection with the business of a private detective or protective agentnew text end , or evidence that the employee has successfully completed equivalent training before the start of employment. Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, this clause is satisfied if the employee provides a prospective employer with a certificate or a copy of a certificate demonstrating that the employee successfully completed this training prior to employment with a different Minnesota licensee and completed this training within three previous calendar years, or successfully completed this training with a Minnesota licensee while previously employed with a Minnesota licensee. The certificate or a copy of the certificate is the property of the employee who completed the training, regardless of who paid for the training or how training was provided. Upon a current or former employee's request, a current or former licensed employer must provide a copy of a certificate demonstrating the employee's successful completion of training to the current or former employee. The current or former licensed employer must not charge the employee a fee for a copy of the certificate. The employee who completed the training is entitled to access a copy of the certificate at no charge according to sections 181.960 to 181.966. A current or former employer must comply with sections 181.960 to 181.966; (2) certification by the board of completion of certified training for a license holder, qualified representative, Minnesota manager, partner, and employee to carry or use a firearm, a weapon other than a firearm, or an immobilizing or restraint technique; and (3) six hours a year of certified continuing training for all license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees, and an additional six hours a year for individuals who are armed with firearms or armed with weapons, which must include annual certification of the individual. new text begin (b) A person seeking a bail enforcement agent license must complete 12 hours of certified training or provide evidence that the person has successfully completed equivalent training before being issued a license. Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, this paragraph is satisfied if a person provides the board with a certificate or a copy of a certificate demonstrating that the person successfully completed the 12 hours of training within three previous calendar years. new text end new text begin (c) new text end An individual may not carry or use a weapon while undergoing on-the-job training under this subdivision. Sec. 15. new text begin [326.3362] EDUCATION AND EXAMINATION REQUIREMENTS; BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Education. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant for a bail enforcement agent license must complete classroom education and training in subjects pertinent to the duties and responsibilities of a bail enforcement agent. At a minimum, education must include: new text end new text begin (1) 20 hours of instruction on relevant laws and regulations, the rights of the accused, professional ethics, and the apprehension of bail fugitives; and new text end new text begin (2) 40 hours of instruction on the power of arrest. new text end new text begin (b) The board may develop, offer, or certify education courses to satisfy the requirements under this subdivision and may charge a fee for any education courses that the board offers. new text end new text begin (c) The board must consult with the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training when developing or reviewing curriculum for training on the power of arrest. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Examination. new text end new text begin (a) The board must establish an examination to determine whether applicants: (1) have knowledge of laws and regulations relating to bail enforcement; and (2) have a general and fair understanding of the obligations and duties of the holder of a bail enforcement agent license. new text end new text begin (b) The board must conduct a written examination at least twice annually. The board may charge an examination fee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Continuing education. new text end new text begin (a) An individual holding a bail enforcement agent license must complete a minimum of 12 hours of continuing education on the topics described in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), prior to the renewal of the individual's license. new text end new text begin (b) The board may develop, offer, or certify continuing education courses to satisfy the requirements under this subdivision and may charge a fee for any continuing education courses that the board offers. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.338, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 7, section 14, is amended to read: 326.338 PERSONS ENGAGED AS PRIVATE DETECTIVES deleted text begin ORdeleted text end new text begin ,new text end PROTECTIVE AGENTSnew text begin , OR BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENTSnew text end . Subdivision 1. Private detective. deleted text begin Personsdeleted text end new text begin A personnew text end who for a fee, reward, or other consideration, deleted text begin undertakedeleted text end new text begin undertakesnew text end any of the following acts for the purpose of obtaining information for others deleted text begin aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end considered to be engaged in the business of a private detective: (1) investigating crimes or wrongs done or threatened against the government of the United States or of any state, county, or municipal subdivision thereof; (2) investigating the identity, habits, conduct, movements, whereabouts, transactions, reputation, or character of any person or organization; (3) investigating the credibility of witnesses or other persons; (4) investigating the location or recovery of lost or stolen property; (5) investigating the origin of and responsibility for libels, losses, accidents, or damage or injuries to persons or property; (6) investigating the affiliation, connection, or relationship of any person, firm, or corporation with any organization, society, or association, or with any official, representative, or member thereof; (7) investigating the conduct, honesty, efficiency, loyalty, or activities of employees, persons seeking employment, agents, or contractors and subcontractors; (8) obtaining through investigation evidence to be used before any authorized investigating committee, board of award, board of arbitration, administrative body, or officer or in preparation for trial of civil or criminal cases; or (9) investigating the identity or apprehension of persons suspected of crimes or misdemeanors. Subd. 4. Protective agent. A person who for a fee, reward, or other valuable consideration undertakes any of the following acts is considered to be engaged in the business of new text begin a new text end protective agent: (1) providing guards, private patrol, or other security personnel to protect persons or their property or to prevent the theft, unlawful taking of goods, merchandise, or money, or to prevent the misappropriation or concealment of goods, merchandise, money, or other valuable things, or to procure the return of those things; (2) physically responding to any alarm signal device, burglar alarm, television camera, still camera, or a mechanical or electronic device installed or used to prevent or detect burglary, theft, shoplifting, pilferage, losses, or other security measures; (3) providing armored car services for the protection of persons or property; (4) controlling motor traffic on public streets, roads, and highways for the purpose of escorting a funeral procession and oversized loads; (5) providing management and control of crowds for the purpose of safety and protection; or (6) providing guards or other security personnel to transport prisoners or any other person arrested on a warrant, except that this does not apply to the transport or escort of offenders by staff of the Department of Corrections; the transport of a person by the sheriff of a county to the appropriate adult or juvenile correctional facility as designated by the commissioner of corrections or to and from court in connection with postconviction, habeas corpus, or intrastate mandatory disposition of detainers proceedings; the transfer of a person by emergency medical services personnel; or the transfer of a person by a peace officer as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), or employed by a federal law enforcement agency. A person covered by this subdivision may perform the traffic-control duties in clause (4) in place of a police officer when a special permit is required, provided that the protective agent is first-aid qualified. new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Bail enforcement agent. new text end new text begin A person who for a fee, reward, or other valuable consideration undertakes any of the following acts is considered to be engaged in the business of a bail enforcement agent: new text end new text begin (1) arresting a defendant for whom a surety is acting as a bonding agent when the defendant is about to flee; new text end new text begin (2) arresting a defendant for whom a surety is acting as a bonding agent when the defendant will not appear as required by the defendant's recognizance; new text end new text begin (3) arresting a defendant for whom a surety is acting as a bonding agent when the defendant will not perform the conditions of a recognizance; or new text end new text begin (4) taking a defendant for whom a surety is acting as a bonding agent before a judge as required under section 629.63. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3381, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibition. No person shall engage in the business of new text begin a new text end private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agent, new text begin bail enforcement agent, new text end or advertise or indicate in any verbal statement or in written material that the person is so engaged or available to supply those services, without having first obtained a license as provided in sections 326.32 to 326.339. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3381, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Application procedure; bail enforcement agent. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of an application for a private detective or protective agent license, the board shall: new text end new text begin (1) post a notice of the application in the board's office for a period of 20 days and notify all persons who have requested notification of applications; new text end new text begin (2) conduct an investigation as the board considers necessary to determine the qualifications of the applicant; and new text end new text begin (3) notify the applicant of the date on which the board will conduct a review of the license application. new text end new text begin (b) The board shall issue a license upon application to any person qualified under sections 326.32 to 326.339 and under the rules of the board to engage in the business of a bail enforcement agent. new text end new text begin (c) The license shall remain effective for two years as long as the license holder complies with sections 326.32 to 326.339, the laws of Minnesota, and the rules of the board. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3381, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Disqualification. (a) No person is qualified to hold a license who has: (1) been convicted of (i) a felony by the courts of this or any other state or of the United States; (ii) acts which, if done in Minnesota, would be criminal sexual conduct; assault; theft; larceny; burglary; robbery; carjacking; unlawful entry; extortion; defamation; buying or receiving stolen property; using, possessing, manufacturing, or carrying weapons unlawfully; using, possessing, or carrying burglary tools unlawfully; escape; possession, production, sale, or distribution of narcotics unlawfully; or (iii) in any other country of acts which, if done in Minnesota, would be a felony or would be any of the other offenses provided in this clause and for which a full pardon or similar relief has not been granted; (2) made any false statement in an application for a license or any document required to be submitted to the board; or (3) failed to demonstrate to the board good character, honesty, and integrity. (b) Upon application for a license, the applicant shall submit, as part of the application, a full set of fingerprints and the applicant's written consent that their fingerprints shall be submitted to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension (BCA) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) to determine whether that person has a criminal record. The BCA shall promptly forward the fingerprints to the FBI and request that the FBI conduct a criminal history check of each prospective licensee. The Minnesota Board of Private Detective and Protective Agents Services shall determine if the FBI report indicates that the prospective licensee or licensee was convicted of a disqualifying offense. The submission to the FBI shall be coordinated through the BCA. The results of the criminal record check shall be provided to the board who will determine if the applicant is disqualified from holding a license under this subdivision. new text begin (c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, no individual is qualified to hold a bail enforcement agent license if a licensing entity in this state or any other jurisdiction has suspended, canceled, or revoked a license or authorization for the individual to act as a private detective, protective agent, bail enforcement agent, or peace officer or if the individual has been subject to any civil, administrative, or criminal penalty for engaging in the business of a private detective, protective agent, bail enforcement agent, or peace officer. The board may waive the disqualification under this paragraph if ten years have passed from the date of the licensing consequence or penalty and the individual shows evidence of rehabilitation. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3382, is amended to read: 326.3382 APPLICATION FOR LICENSE. Subdivision 1. Application form. (a) Application for a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end license shall be made on a form prescribed by the board. Each applicant shall provide the following information: (1) the full name, date of birth, and sex of each person signing the application, and the residences of those persons for the past five years; (2) all past and present occupations and employers, length of employment, and the name, address, and telephone numbers of supervisors for all persons signing the application; (3) the address or a description indicating the location of the place of business of the applicant; (4) a statement indicating that each person signing the application has attained the age of 18; (5) if the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation, the date and place of incorporation, and the location of its principal place of business or registered office in its state of incorporation; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (6) if the applicant is seeking a bail enforcement agent license: new text end new text begin (i) a copy of any current or former license issued by the board authorizing the person to engage in the business of a private detective or protective agent or proof of current or former employment with any entity licensed by the board to engage in the business of a private detective or protective agent; new text end new text begin (ii) a copy of any current or former license issued by a licensing entity in another jurisdiction authorizing the person to engage in the business of a private detective or protective agent or proof of current or former employment with any entity licensed by a licensing entity in another jurisdiction to engage in the business of a private detective or protective agent; new text end new text begin (iii) disclosure of whether a licensing entity in this state or any other jurisdiction has suspended, canceled, or revoked a license or authorization for the person to act as a private detective, protective agent, bail enforcement agent, or peace officer; and new text end new text begin (iv) disclosure of whether the individual has been subject to any civil, administrative, or criminal penalty for engaging in the business of a private detective, protective agent, bail enforcement agent, or peace officer; and new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end further facts as may be required by the board to show the good character, competency, and integrity of each person signing the applicationdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end (b) Each application shall be signed and acknowledged as follows: (1) if the applicant is an individual, by the individual; (2) if the applicant is a partnership, by each partner, one of whom must be a qualified representative; or (3) if the applicant is a corporation, by the chief executive officer, chief financial officer, and the qualified representative of the corporation. If the principal place of the applicant's business is outside Minnesota, the application shall also include the signature of the Minnesota manager. Subd. 2. Documents accompanying application. (a) Each individual signing the application shall submit: (1) references, on forms provided by the board, from five persons who have known the deleted text begin signerdeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end for at least five years, and who are not related by blood or marriage to the signer; and (2) a recent photograph and a full set of fingerprints for each person signing the application. (b) If the application is for a private detective license, the individual signing the application shall submit a statement under oath by a present or previous employer that the applicant for an individual license, the qualified representative for a partnership or corporate license, or the Minnesota manager, as appropriate, has been employed as an investigator for a minimum of 6,000 hours by any of the following: (1) a licensed private detective agency; (2) a United States government investigative service; (3) a city police department or sheriff's office; or (4) an occupation that, the board finds equivalent in scope, responsibility, and training to one of the specific occupations listed; and has the qualifications established in the rules of the board. (c) If the application is for a protective agent license, each deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin individualnew text end signing the application shall submit a statement under oath by a present or previous employer that the applicant for an individual license, the qualified representative for a partnership or corporate license, or the Minnesota manager has been employed as an investigator or protective agent for a minimum of 6,000 hours by any of the following: (1) a licensed protective agent or licensed private detective, having gained experience in security systems, audits, and supervision; (2) a United States government investigative service; (3) a city police department or sheriff's office; or (4) an occupation that the board finds equivalent in scope, responsibility, and training to one of the specific occupations listed; and has the qualifications established in the rules of the board. new text begin (d) If the application is for a bail enforcement agent license, the applicant shall submit: new text end new text begin (1) proof that the applicant has completed the training required under section 326.3361; new text end new text begin (2) proof that the applicant has satisfied the education and examination requirements under section 326.3362; and new text end new text begin (3) results of a license examination given in the previous 12 months or, for an application to renew a license, proof of completion of the applicable continuing education requirements. new text end Subd. 3. Proof of insurance. (a) No license may be issued to a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end applicant until the applicant has complied with the requirements in this subdivision. (b) The applicant shall execute a surety bond to the state of Minnesota in the penal sum of $10,000 and file it with the board. The surety bond must be executed by a company authorized to do business in the state of Minnesota, must name the applicant as principal, and must state that the applicant and each of the applicant's employees shall faithfully observe all of the laws of Minnesota and of the United States and shall pay all damages suffered by any person by reason of a violation of law by the applicant or by the commission of any willful and malicious wrong by the applicant in the course of business. (c) The applicant shall furnish proof, acceptable to the board, of the applicant's ability to respond in damages for liability on account of accidents or wrongdoings arising out of the ownership and operation of a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end business. Compliance with paragraph (d), (e), or (f) is satisfactory proof of financial responsibility for purposes of this paragraph. (d) The applicant may file with the board a certificate of insurance demonstrating coverage for general liability, completed operations, and personal injury. Personal injury insurance must include coverage for: (1) false arrest, detention, imprisonment, and malicious prosecution; (2) libel, slander, defamation, and violation of rights of privacy; and (3) wrongful entry, eviction, and other invasion of rights of private occupancy. In the event of a policy cancellation, the insurer will send notice to the board at the same time that a cancellation request is received from or a notice is sent to the insured. (e) The applicant may file with the board an annual net worth statement, signed by a licensed certified public accountant, evidencing that the applicant has a net worth of at least the following: (1) for an applicant with no employees, $10,000; (2) for an applicant with one to ten employees, $15,000; (3) for an applicant with 11 to 25 employees, $25,000; (4) for an applicant with 26 to 50 employees, $50,000; or (5) for an applicant with 51 or more employees, $100,000. Data indicating with which of the above requirements an applicant must comply is public data. The contents of the net worth statement are private data on individuals or nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02. (f) The applicant may file with the board an irrevocable letter of credit from a financial institution acceptable to the board in the amount listed in the appropriate category in paragraph (e). Subd. 4. License disqualification. Unlicensed activity will not be considered as legitimate experience for qualification in being licensed. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in section 326.3381, subdivision 3, paragraph (c), new text end an individual, new text begin a new text end partnership, new text begin a new text end corporation, new text begin a new text end qualified representative, or new text begin a new text end Minnesota manager engaged in the business of a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end without a license issued by the board is prohibited from applying for licensing for a period of one year from the date of a finding of the violation. Subd. 5. Special protective agent classification. The board shall establish a special protective agent license classification that provides that a person described in section 326.338, subdivision 4, clause (4), who is otherwise qualified under this section need not meet the requirements of subdivision 2, paragraph (c). Subd. 6. Temporary military license. The board shall establish a temporary license to engage in the business of new text begin a new text end private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end in accordance with section 197.4552. The fee for the temporary license under this subdivision for a private detective is $1,000. The fee for a temporary license under this subdivision for a protective agent is $800. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3383, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. new text begin (a) new text end The board shall reissue a private detective or protective agent license to a license holder without further board review, if the license holder who has complied with all applicable laws and rules: (1) submits to the board an application for license reissuance on a form prescribed by the board; (2) submits to the board a list of all current employees; and (3) remits the expired license to the board. new text begin (b) This section does not apply to a bail enforcement agent license. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3384, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibition. No license holder or employee of a license holder shall, in a manner that implies that the person is an employee or agent of a governmental agency, display on a badge, identification card, emblem, vehicle, uniform, stationery, or in advertising for private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end services: (1) the words "public safety," "police," "highway patrol," "state patrol," "sheriff," "trooper," or "law enforcement"; or (2) the name of a municipality, county, state, or of the United States, or any governmental subdivision thereof. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3384, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Immigration enforcement prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) A bail enforcement agent must not engage in efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law or efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the United States. new text end new text begin (b) A bail enforcement agent must not disclose or provide in writing, verbally, or in any other manner, personally identifiable information of any bail fugitive that is requested for purposes of immigration enforcement, except pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or court order. new text end new text begin (c) According to United States Code, title 8, sections 1373 and 1644, this subdivision does not prohibit or restrict any governmental entity or official from: new text end new text begin (1) sending to or receiving from federal immigration authorities information regarding the citizenship or lawful or unlawful immigration status of an individual; new text end new text begin (2) requesting from federal immigration authorities lawful or unlawful immigration status information of any individual; or new text end new text begin (3) maintaining or exchanging the citizenship or lawful or unlawful immigration status information of an individual with any other federal, state, or local governmental entity. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3385, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Notice of successor. new text begin (a) new text end A corporate or partnership license holder shall, within seven days of the death, resignation, or removal of a person signing the license application, give written notice to the board of the change and the name and address of the successor in the vacated position. new text begin (b) new text end Within seven days of the death, resignation, or removal of a person signing the license application for a partnership or corporate license holder, the successor qualified representative, partner, Minnesota manager, chief executive officer, or chief financial officer who shall qualify under the same procedure and criteria, and submit the documents required, as for an original application. new text begin (c) This subdivision does not apply to a bail enforcement agent license issued to an individual. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3386, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application fee. Each applicant for a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end license shall pay to the board a nonrefundable application fee, as determined by the board. Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3386, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. License fee. Each applicant for a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end license shall pay to the board a license fee, as determined by the board. new text begin The fee for a bail enforcement agent license must be at least $500 for an initial license and $250 for a license renewal. new text end In the event that an applicant is denied licensing by the board, one-half of the license fee shall be refunded to the applicant. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3387, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Basis for action. (a) The board may revoke or suspend or refuse to issue or reissue a private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end license if: (1) the license holder violates a provision of sections 326.32 to 326.339 or a rule adopted under those sections; (2) the license holder has engaged in fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation while in the business of new text begin a new text end private detective deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end protective agentnew text begin , or bail enforcement agentnew text end ; (3) the license holder has made a false statement in an application submitted to the board or in a document required to be submitted to the board; (4) the license holder violates an order of the board; or (5) the individual or entity previously operated without a license. (b) The board must revoke or suspend or refuse to issue or reissue a protective agent license if the license holder provides guards or other security personnel to transport prisoners or any other person arrested on a warrant and the board determines that the license holder or any employee or agent of the license holder committed an act in any place that, if committed in Minnesota, would constitute criminal sexual conduct against a person being transported or committed an act in any place that involved the unreasonable use of force on a person being transported. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3389, is amended to read: 326.3389 LICENSES NONTRANSFERABLEnew text begin ; PUBLIC LISTnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A license issued under sections 326.32 to 326.339 may not be transferred. new text begin (b) The board must maintain a list of all individuals who have at any time been holders of bail enforcement agent licenses together with the individuals' license numbers. The list must be made public and must be posted on the board's public facing website. The public list must indicate whether each individual's license status is active, inactive, suspended, or revoked. The board must update the list promptly after a change in the status of an individual's license. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.63, is amended to read: 629.63 SURETY ARREST OF DEFENDANT. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Arrest authorized. new text end new text begin (a) new text end If a surety new text begin reasonably new text end believes that a defendant for whom the surety is acting as bonding agent (1) is about to flee, (2) will not appear as required by the defendant's recognizance, or (3) will otherwise not perform the conditions of the recognizance, the surety may arrest or have deleted text begin another persondeleted text end new text begin a bail enforcement agent licensed under sections 326.32 to 326.339new text end or the sheriff arrest the defendant. new text begin (b) new text end If the surety or deleted text begin another persondeleted text end new text begin a bail enforcement agentnew text end at the surety's direction arrests the defendant, the surety or the deleted text begin other persondeleted text end new text begin bail enforcement agentnew text end shall take the defendant before the judge before whom the defendant was required to appear and surrender the defendant to that judge. new text begin (c) new text end If the surety wants the sheriff to arrest the defendant, the surety shall deliver a certified copy of the recognizance under which the defendant is held to the sheriff, with a direction endorsed on the recognizance requiring the sheriff to arrest the defendant and bring the defendant before the appropriate judge. new text begin (d) new text end Upon receiving a certified copy of the recognizance and payment of the sheriff's fees, the sheriff shall arrest the defendant and bring the defendant before the judge. new text begin (e) new text end Before a surety who has arrested a defendant who has violated the conditions of release may personally surrender the defendant to the appropriate judge, the surety shall notify the sheriff. If the defendant at the hearing before the judge is unable to post increased bail or meet alternative conditions of release in accordance with rule 6.03 of the Rules of Criminal Procedure, the sheriff or a deputy shall take the defendant into custody. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Documentation requirements. new text end new text begin (a) When making an arrest pursuant to this section, a licensed bail enforcement agent must possess proper documentation of the authority to apprehend issued by the surety. The authority to apprehend documentation under this paragraph must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name of the bail enforcement agent and any fictitious name, if applicable; new text end new text begin (2) the address of the principal office of the bail enforcement agent; and new text end new text begin (3) the name and principal business address of the surety. new text end new text begin (b) Upon the request of the bail fugitive being apprehended, a bail enforcement agent must provide a copy of the documentation described in paragraph (a) to the bail fugitive, the bail fugitive's attorney, or another individual indicated by the bail fugitive. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Uniform required. new text end new text begin When attempting to apprehend a bail fugitive, a bail enforcement agent must wear a jacket, shirt, or vest with the words "BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT," "BAIL ENFORCEMENT," or "BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENT" displayed in letters at least two inches high across the front or back of the jacket, shirt, or vest. The words required under this subdivision must not be covered by any other clothing or equipment and must be of a color contrasting with the background color so that the bail enforcement agent is easily identifiable. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Record retention. new text end new text begin (a) A bail enforcement agent must maintain the following records: new text end new text begin (1) a copy of the documentation of the authority to apprehend a bail fugitive as described in subdivision 2, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (2) a list of all bail fugitives that the bail enforcement agent has been authorized to apprehend and the identities of the sureties providing authorization for each individual; and new text end new text begin (3) the dates, approximate times, and locations at which the bail enforcement agent apprehended each bail fugitive. new text end new text begin (b) A bail enforcement agent must retain records under this subdivision for seven years. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notification to local law enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) Except under exigent circumstances, a bail enforcement agent must notify the local law enforcement agency before attempting to apprehend a bail fugitive. Notice must be made within six hours of the attempt and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name of the bail enforcement agent attempting to apprehend the bail fugitive; new text end new text begin (2) the approximate time at which the bail enforcement agent intends to attempt to apprehend the bail fugitive; and new text end new text begin (3) the name and suspected location of the bail fugitive. new text end new text begin (b) If exigent circumstance exist and the bail enforcement agent does not provide prior notification to the local law enforcement agency, the bail enforcement agent must notify the agency immediately after the apprehension. Upon request of the law enforcement agency, a bail enforcement agent must submit a detailed explanation of the exigent circumstances within three working days of the apprehension. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Forcible entry prohibited. new text end new text begin A bail enforcement agent must not forcibly enter a dwelling house except as provided in section 629.39. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Firearms. new text end new text begin A bail enforcement agent must not carry a firearm or other weapon unless the bail enforcement agent has been issued the appropriate permit and is in compliance with all applicable laws. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end